Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6269.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 19.112.010 and 2009 c 132 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Alcohol fuel" means any alcohol made from a product other than petroleum or natural gas that is used alone or in combination with gasoline or other petroleum products for use as a fuel in self-propelled motor vehicles.(2) (("Alternative fuel" means all products or energy sources used to propel motor vehicles, other than conventional gasoline, diesel, or reformulated gasoline. Alternative fuel includes, but is not limited to, liquefied petroleum gas, liquefied natural gas, compressed natural gas, biodiesel fuel, E85 motor fuel, fuels containing seventy percent or more by volume of alcohol fuel, fuels that are derived from biomass, hydrogen fuel, anhydrous ammonia fuel, nonhazardous motor fuel, or electricity, excluding onboard electric generation.(3))) "Biodiesel fuel" means the monoalkyl esters of long chain fatty acids derived from plant or animal matter that meet the registration requirements for fuels and fuel additives established by the federal environmental protection agency and standards established by the American society of testing and materials.(((4)))(3) "Diesel" means special fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020, and diesel fuel dyed in accordance with the regulations in 26 C.F.R. Sec. 48.4082-1T as of October 24, 2005.(((5)))(4) "Director" means the director of agriculture.(((6)))(5) "E85 motor fuel" means ((an alternative))motor fuel that is a blend of ethanol and hydrocarbon of which the ethanol portion is nominally ((seventy-five))75 to ((eighty-five))85 percent denatured fuel ethanol by volume that complies with the most recent version of American society of testing and materials specification D 5798.(((7)))(6) "Motor fuel" means any liquid or gaseous product used for the ((generation of power in an internal combustion engine used for the)) propulsion of a motor vehicle upon the highways of this state((, and any biodiesel fuel))or that is intended for use for transportation purposes. Motor fuels containing ethanol may be marketed if either (a) the base motor fuel meets the applicable standards before the addition of the ethanol or (b) the resultant blend meets the applicable standards after the addition of the ethanol.(((8)))(7) "Nonhazardous motor fuel" means any fuel of a type distributed for use in self-propelled motor vehicles that does not contain a hazardous liquid as defined in RCW 19.122.020.(((9)))(8) "Renewable diesel" means a diesel fuel substitute produced from nonpetroleum renewable sources, including vegetable oils and animal fats, that meets the registration requirements for fuels and fuel additives established by the federal environmental protection agency in 40 C.F.R. Part 79 (2008) and meets the requirements of American society of testing and materials specification D 975.--- END ---